Louisiana, session 2026, HB110.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development,
notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized and
empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease or deliver any interest, excluding mineral
rights, the state may have to all or any portion of the following described parcel of property
to the city of Mandeville:
Lot 67 Lakewood Heights CB 1478 246 CB 1511 804 IN, Tax District 14,
Subdivision Phase 1.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development is
hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, covenants, conditions, and stipulations and
to execute such documents as necessary to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer,
assignment, lease or delivery of title, excluding mineral rights, to the property described in
Section 1 of this Act, and as more specifically described in any such agreements entered into
and documents executed by and between the secretary of the Department of Transportation
and Development and the city of Mandeville, in exchange for consideration proportionate
to the appraised value of the property.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 110 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2